South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3796.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 29 Legal Personhood Section 1-1-1910.  (A) As used in this article: (1) "Body of water" means any natural or man-made accumulation of water, regardless of whether the accumulation of water is static or subject to a force that causes a hydrological current. (2) "Governmental entity" means: (a) a court; (b) the General Assembly; (c) the governing body of a political subdivision; or (d) another entity of the State or a political subdivision, if the entity has adjudicatory or rulemaking authority. (3) "Human being" means a member of the species classified as Homo sapiens; (4) "Land" means the solid terrestrial surface or subsurface of the earth. (5) "Legal personhood" means: (a) the legal rights and obligations of an individual under the laws of this State; or (b) the legal rights and obligations of a person other than an individual under the laws of this State. (6) "Political subdivision" means the same as that term is defined in Section 2-7-76. (7) "Real property" means any building, fixture, improvement, appurtenance, structure, or other development that is affixed permanently to land. (8) "State" means the same as that term is defined in Section 1-3-490. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a governmental entity may not grant legal personhood to, nor recognize legal personhood in: (1) artificial intelligence; (2) an inanimate object; (3) a body of water; (4) land; (5) real property; (6) atmospheric gases; (7) an astronomical object; (8) weather; (9) a plant; (10) a nonhuman animal; or (11) any other member of a taxonomic domain that is not a human being. SECTION 2.  This act takes upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----